Utah statutes.
72-10-304.   Powers and duties of division.
(1)  The division may make available its engineering and other technical
services, with or without charge, to the state, a county, municipality, or
airport authority or person desiring them in connection with the planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of airports
or air navigation facilities.
(2) (a)  The division may render financial assistance by grant, loan, or both,
to any county, municipality, or airport authority, in the planning,
acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an
airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by the county,
municipality, or airport authority, out of appropriations made by the
Legislature for these purposes.
(b)  Financial assistance may be furnished in connection with federal or other
financial aid for the same purposes.
(3) (a)  The division may use the facilities and services of other state
agencies and of the counties and municipalities to the utmost extent possible.
(b)  The state agencies, counties, and municipalities shall make available
their facilities and services.
(4)  All powers granted to any county, municipality, or airport authority by
this  chapter may be exercised jointly with any county, municipality, or
airport authority, and jointly with any state agency or the United States if
the laws of the other state or of the United States permit  the joint
exercise.
